Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 2. Division of Geology and Mineral Resources.

§ 45.2-107.
Division of Geology and Mineral Resources; State Geologist.

There is established in the Department a Division of Geology and Mineral Resources. The Director shall appoint a geologist of established reputation as the Commissioner of Mineral Resources and State Geologist to serve as chief executive and head officer of the Division. As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning, “Division” means the Division of Geology and Mineral Resources.

History.

1984, c. 590, § 45.1-383; 2008, c. 369; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1984, c. 590, cl. 3 provides: “That no provision of this act shall be construed as authorizing or establishing a program for the permitting of uranium mining.”

Acts 1984, c. 590, cl. 5 provides: “That the Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy shall be deemed the successor in interest to the Division of Mined Land Reclamation and the Division of Mineral Resources [now the Division of Geology and Mineral Resources] in the Department of Conservation and Economic Development, the Division of Mines in the Department of Labor and Industry, and the State Energy Office in the Office of Emergency Services [now Department of Emergency Management] to the extent that this act transfers powers and duties. All rightful title to and interest in any real or tangible personal property or records vested in those existing agencies shall be transferred to and taken as standing in the name of the Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy to the extent that this act transfers powers and duties.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532,
amended § 45.1-383, from which this section is derived. Since the amendments had been incorporated by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, the amendments by c. 532 were not given effect.

§ 45.2-108.
General powers and duties of State Geologist.

The State Geologist shall exercise those powers and perform those duties, in relation to mineral resources, geology, and geophysical matters, that are conferred or imposed upon the Director by the provisions of this title, including powers and duties delegated to him by the Director. The State Geologist may also exercise and perform such other powers and duties as are lawfully delegated to him and such powers and duties as are conferred or imposed upon him by law.

History.

1984, c. 590, § 45.1-384; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-109.
Using or revealing proprietary information.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, neither the State Geologist nor any employee or agent of the Division shall make use of or reveal any proprietary information or statistic gathered from any source for any purpose other than that of this chapter, except with the express written consent of the source of such information or statistic. The State Geologist shall not reveal such information to the Director or any other employee of the Department who is not employed within the Division.

History.

1984, c. 590, § 45.1-385; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-110.
Powers and duties of the Division.

The Division has the following powers and duties:

Examination of the geological formations of the Commonwealth and the resources contained therein, with special reference to both economic products and energy resources, including coal, ore, clay, feldspar, lime, natural gas, oil, cement, sand and gravel, stone, materials suitable for use in building and road construction, mineral water, other mineral substances, and geothermal energy resources.

Examination of latent resources and waste minerals to determine the best methods of utilizing them and study of the soils and weathered residuum as related to parent rock.

Maintenance of repositories for representative rock and mineral materials from various wells, mines, excavations, and naturally occurring exposures.

Maintenance of records and statistics of the mineral industry and geological conditions of the Commonwealth.

Performance of chemical and physical tests, including test borings, to acquire subsurface information relative to mineral deposits masked by soils and rock overburden.

Examination of the physical features of the Commonwealth with reference to their practical bearing upon the occupation and well-being of the people.

Preparation of special geological and economic maps and displays to illustrate the resources of the Commonwealth.

Preparation of regular and special reports, with necessary illustrations and maps, that embrace both a general and detailed description of the geology and mineral resources of the Commonwealth.

Consideration of such other scientific and economic questions that in the judgment of the Director are deemed of value to the people of the Commonwealth.

Arrangement for the investigation and reporting of the geology of the Commonwealth with the Director or the representative of the United States Geological Survey (USGS) in regard to cooperation between the USGS and the Department in topographic and geologic work when deemed necessary and of advantage to the Commonwealth. The Director may accept or reject the work of the USGS.

Participation in matters requiring advice and guidance sought by state agencies and institutions concerning geological and mineral resources as related to state lands.

Provision of basic research and the development of methods utilized in the determination of characteristics, structure, and origin for geological formations and economic mineral deposits.

History.

1984, c. 590, § 45.1-386; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-111.
Publication of reports.

The Director may direct the publication of the reports of the Division, with proper illustrations and maps, and the reports shall be distributed as the interests of the Commonwealth and of science indicate.

History.

1984, c. 590, § 45.1-387; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-112.
Disposition of materials that have served purpose of the Division.

Materials collected after having served the purpose of the Division shall be distributed to the educational institutions of the Commonwealth in the manner that the Director determines to be of the greatest advantage to the educational interests of the Commonwealth.

History.

1984, c. 590, § 45.1-388; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-113.
Immunity from prosecution for trespass.

No criminal action for trespass shall lie against the State Geologist or any agent or employee of the State Geologist pursuant to any lawful act done in the performance of his duties, including entry upon the lands of any person for the purpose of performing such duties.

History.

1984, c. 590, § 45.1-389; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”